Missouri, session 2026, SB1059.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 442.404, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 442.404,
to read as follows:
442.404. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Homeowners' association", a nonprofit corporation
or unincorporated association of homeowners created under a
declaration to own and operate portions of a planned
community or other residential subdivision that has the
power under the declaration to assess association members to
pay the costs and expenses incurred in the performance of
the association's obligations under the declaration or
tenants-in-common with respect to the ownership of common
ground or amenities of a planned community or other
residential subdivision. This term shall not include a
condominium unit owners' association as defined and provided
for in subdivision (3) of section 448.1-103 or a residential
cooperative;
(2) "Political signs", any fixed, ground-mounted
display in support of or in opposition to a person seeking
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1059 2
elected office or a ballot measure excluding any materials
that may be attached;
(3) "Solar panel or solar collector", a device used to
collect and convert solar energy into electricity or thermal
energy, including but not limited to photovoltaic cells or
panels, or solar thermal systems.
2. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar
binding agreements running with the land shall prohibit or
have the effect of prohibiting the display of political
signs.
(2) A homeowners' association has the authority to
adopt reasonable rules, subject to any applicable statutes
or ordinances, regarding the time, size, place, number, and
manner of display of political signs.
(3) A homeowners' association may remove a political
sign without liability if such sign is placed within the
common ground, threatens the public health or safety,
violates an applicable statute or ordinance, is accompanied
by sound or music, or if any other materials are attached to
the political sign. Subject to the foregoing, a homeowners'
association shall not remove a political sign from the
property of a homeowner or impose any fine or penalty upon
the homeowner unless it has given such homeowner three days
after providing written notice to the homeowner, which
notice shall specifically identify the rule and the nature
of the violation.
3. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar
binding agreements running with the land shall limit or
prohibit, or have the effect of limiting or prohibiting, the
installation of solar panels or solar collectors on the
rooftop of any property or structure.

SB 1059 3
(2) A homeowners' association may adopt reasonable
rules, subject to any applicable statutes or ordinances,
regarding the placement of solar panels or solar collectors
to the extent that those rules do not prevent the
installation of the device, impair the functioning of the
device, restrict the use of the device, or adversely affect
the cost or efficiency of the device.
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall apply only
with regard to rooftops that are owned, controlled, and
maintained by the owner of the individual property or
structure.
4. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar
binding agreements running with the land shall prohibit or
have the effect of prohibiting the display of sale signs on
the property of a homeowner or property owner including, but
not limited to, any yard on the property, or nearby street
corners.
(2) A homeowners' association has the authority to
adopt reasonable rules, subject to any applicable statutes
or ordinances, regarding the time, size, place, number, and
manner of display of sale signs.
(3) A homeowners' association may remove a sale sign
without liability if such sign is placed within the common
ground, threatens the public health or safety, violates an
applicable statute or ordinance, is accompanied by sound or
music, or if any other materials are attached to the sale
sign. Subject to the foregoing, a homeowners' association
shall not remove a sale sign from the property of a
homeowner or property owner or impose any fine or penalty
upon the homeowner or property owner unless it has given
such homeowner or property owner three business days after
the homeowner or property owner receives written notice from

SB 1059 4
the homeowners' association, which notice shall specifically
identify the rule and the nature of the alleged violation.
5. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar
binding agreements running with the land shall prohibit or
have the effect of prohibiting ownership or pasturing of [up
to] no more than six chickens on a lot that is two-tenths of
an acre or larger, including prohibitions against a single
chicken coop designed to accommodate up to six chickens.
(2) A homeowners' association may adopt reasonable
rules, subject to applicable statutes or ordinances,
regarding ownership or pasturing of chickens, including a
prohibition or restriction on ownership or pasturing of
roosters.
✓